Rhode Island, session 2026, HB8328.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Title 8 of the General Laws entitled "COURTS AND CIVIL PROCEDURE
— COURTS" is hereby amended by adding thereto the following chapter:
CHAPTER 20
PERMITTING VIRTUAL OR REMOTE COURT HEARINGS
8-20-1. Remote and virtual court appearances permitted.
Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, in all courts of the State of Rhode
Island including, but not limited to, the supreme court, superior court, family court, district court,
workers’ compensation court, and traffic tribunal, any hearing, conference, motion, proceeding, or
other court appearance may be conducted in whole or in part by virtual or remote means, as
permitted by the court.
8-20-2. Right to remote participation.
Any party to a proceeding including, but not limited to, a plaintiff, defendant, respondent,
witness, or attorney of record, shall be permitted to participate in and appear at any court proceeding
remotely by using a telephone or video conference connection, subject to reasonable rules and
procedures adopted by the court to ensure the orderly administration of justice.
8-20-3. Judicial discretion.
A court may require an in-person appearance upon a specific finding, stated on the record,
that a remote appearance would materially prejudice the rights of a party, impair the integrity of

the proceeding, or otherwise interfere with the fair and efficient administration of justice.
8-20-4. Equal legal effect.
An appearance made remotely pursuant to this section shall have the same force and effect
as an appearance made in person, and no party shall be disadvantaged or prejudiced solely because
such party or attorney appears remotely.
8-20-5. Rules and procedures.
The chief justice or presiding authority of each court may promulgate rules, administrative
orders, or procedures governing the use of remote or virtual appearances, including standards for
technology, notice, verification of identity, and the creation of an official record.
8-20-6. Accessibility.
Courts shall endeavor to ensure that remote participation options are reasonably accessible
to self-represented litigants and individuals with disabilities, consistent with applicable state and
federal law.
SECTION 2. This act shall take effect upon passage.
========
LC006138
========
LC006138 - Page 2 of 3